Louisiana, session 2026, SB422.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:98.4(D) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:98.4(E) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§98.4. Operating while impaired; fourth offense; penalties
* * *
D. Except as provided in Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section, in addition to
any sentence of imprisonment, home incarceration, treatment program or drug
division probation program as provided for by R.S. 13:5301 et seq., supervised
probation, or parole, the court shall order that, beginning on the date of the
offender's release from incarceration or the offender's completion of home
incarceration, a treatment program or drug division probation program,
supervised probation, or parole, the offender be placed on unsupervised
probation, with the unsupervised probation ending either upon the full term
date of the original sentence or twenty years from the date of sentencing,
whichever period is longer.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 422 ENROLLED
E. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order, upon motion of the
prosecuting district attorney, that the vehicle being operated by the offender at the
time of the offense be seized and impounded, and sold at auction in accordance with
the provisions of R.S. 14:98(F).
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.